Georgia, session 2025_26, HB107.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 1 of Title 43 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to general
provisions of professions and businesses, is amended by adding a new Code section to read
as follows:
"43-1-37.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Digitally verifiable license' means a license that:
(A) Can be accessed electronically;
(B) Has a digital signature;
H. B. 107
- 1 -

LC 55 0392
(C) Can be mathematically identified; and
(D) Is equivalent to the possession of a physical license.
(2) 'License' shall have the same meaning as provided in Code Section 43-1-34.
(3) 'Other board' shall have the same meaning as provided in Code Section 43-1-34.
(4) 'Service member' shall have the same meaning as provided in Code Section 43-1-34.
(5) 'State' shall have the same meaning as provided in Code Section 43-1-35.
(6) 'Transitioning service member' shall have the same meaning as provided in Code
Section 43-1-34.
(b) No later than July 1, 2026, each professional licensing board and other board shall
adopt rules and regulations implementing a process by which spouses of service members,
spouses of transitioning service members, and transitioning service members may qualify
for digitally verifiable licenses for each profession, business, or trade for which licenses
are issued. Such digitally verifiable licenses shall be issued for all types of licenses issued
by such professional licensing board or other board, including, but not limited to,
temporary licenses, licenses by endorsement, expedited licenses, or a combination thereof.
Such rules and regulations shall include a process by which a physical license shall be
issued upon request in addition to or in the place of a digitally verifiable license.
(c) Any professional licensing board or other board created after June 30, 2026, shall adopt
within one year of its creation the rules and regulations required by subsection (b) of this
Code section."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 107
- 2 -